Colorado statutes. TITLE 42 VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC
PART 5
COLORADO ROAD AND COMMUNITY
SAFETY ACT

42-2-501. Short title.

This part 5 may be known and cited as the "Colorado Road and Community Safety Act".

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire part added, (SB 13-251), ch. 402, p. 2352, § 4, effective August 7.

42-2-502. Legislative declaration.

The purpose of this part 5 is to authorize an individual to qualify for a driver's license, minor driver's license, instruction permit, or identification card despite the individual not being lawfully present or being temporarily lawfully present in the United States. This part 5 is not intended to change other qualifications, requirements, or consequences of holding the document under parts 1 to 3 of this article, article 7 of this title, or any other provision of law. The suspension or revocation of driving privileges, the required fees, financial responsibility requirements, rules of the road, administrative procedures and hearings, qualifications for a driver's license, violations and penalties, and other provisions that apply to driver's licenses, minor driver's licenses, instruction permits, and identification cards are not intended to be affected by this part 5.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire part added, (SB 13-251), ch. 402, p. 2352, § 4, effective August 7.

42-2-503. Definitions.

As used in this part 5, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Identification document" means a driver's license, minor driver's license, instruction permit, or identification card issued by the department of revenue under parts 1 and 3 of this article.

"Proof of return filing" means the document issued under section 39-21-113 (4)(b), C.R.S., that certifies that the applicant filed a Colorado resident income tax return.

"Temporarily present" means a person whose authority to lawfully remain in the United States is temporary and who qualifies for a temporary identification document card under Pub.L. 109-13, Division B, Title II, sec. 202 (c)(2)(C).

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire part added, (SB 13-251), ch. 402, p. 2352, § 4, effective August 7.

42-2-504. Applicability.

This part 5 applies to identification documents for individuals who are not citizens of the United States and who do not have permanent residency status.

Other provisions. Parts 1 to 4 of this article 2 and article 7 of this title 42 apply to identification documents issued or renewed under this part 5, but to the extent there is a conflict, this part 5 supercedes parts 1 to 3 of this article 2 and article 7 of this title 42 for identification documents issued in compliance with this part 5.

Commercial driver's licenses. This part 5 does not authorize the issuance of a commercial driver's license or commercial driving learner's permit under part 4 of this article to a person who is not lawfully present in the United States.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire part added, (SB 13-251), ch. 402, p. 2352, § 4, effective August 7.

L. 2018:

(2) amended, (SB 18-108), ch. 260, p. 1595, § 1, effective January 1, 2019.

42-2-505. Identification documents - individuals not lawfully present - rules.

Documents issued. An individual who is not lawfully present in the United States may apply for an identification document in accordance with this part 5. The department shall issue an identification document to an applicant who:

Qualifies for the document applied for except for qualifications that conflict with this section; and

Signs an affidavit that the applicant is currently a resident and presents proof of return filing for the immediately preceding year and evidence of residence in Colorado that conforms to the standards of Pub.L. 109-13, Division B, Title II, sec. 201 et seq. or any rules promulgated under Pub.L. 109-13, Division B, Title II, sec. 201 et seq.; or

Signs an affidavit that the applicant has continuously been a resident in Colorado for the immediately preceding twenty-four months and presents evidence of residence in Colorado for the immediately preceding twenty-four months that conforms to the standards of Pub.L. 109-13, Division B, Title II, sec. 201 et seq. or any rules promulgated under Pub.L. 109-13, Division B, Title II, sec. 201 et seq.; and

Documents an individual taxpayer identification number issued by the United States internal revenue service; or

Documents a social security number issued by the United States social security administration, which documentation may include a social security card or any other documentation acceptable to the department as provided by rule if the federal government confirms the individual's social security number. This confirmation must include electronic confirmation through the social security online verification system commonly known as SSOLV; and

Affirms in an affidavit signed by the applicant that the applicant has applied to be lawfully present within the United States or will apply to be lawfully present as soon as the applicant is eligible; and

Presents one of the following from the applicant's country of origin:

A passport;

A consular identification card; or

A military identification document.

(1.5) (a) The department shall issue a new identification document to a person who has a gender different from the sex denoted on that person's identification document when the department receives a new birth certificate issued pursuant to section 25-2-113.8 or when the department receives:

A statement, in a form or format designated by the department, from the person, or from the person's parent if the person is a minor, or from the person's guardian or legal representative, signed under penalty of law, confirming the sex designation on the person's identification document does not align with the person's gender identity; and

If the person is a minor under the age of eighteen, a statement, in a form or format designated by the department, signed under penalty of law, from a professional medical or mental health care provider licensed in good standing in Colorado or with an equivalent license in good standing from another jurisdiction, stating that the sex designation on the birth certificate does not align with the minor's gender identity. This subsection (1.5)(a)(II) does not require a minor to undergo any specific surgery, treatment, clinical care, or behavioral health care.

The department may only amend a sex designation for an individual's identification document one time upon the individual's request. Any further requests from the individual for additional sex designation changes require the submission of a court order indicating that the sex designation change is required.

Document contents.

On an identification document issued under this section, the department shall place the phrase "Not valid for federal identification, voting, or public benefit purposes" clearly displayed on the face and incorporated into the machine readable zone. The department may use a substantially similar phrase if required by federal law.

The department shall design the identification document issued under this section to be distinguishable from another identification document issued under this article in compliance with federal law.

Graduated driver's license requirements. To be issued a minor driver's license under this section, an applicant who is under eighteen years of age must comply with section 42-2-104 (4).

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire part added, (SB 13-251), ch. 402, p. 2353, § 4, effective August 7.

L. 2018:

IP(1) and (1)(c) amended, (SB 18-108), ch. 260, p. 1595, § 2, effective January 1, 2019.

L. 2019:

(1.5) added, (HB 19-1039), ch. 377, p. 3407, § 5, effective January 1, 2020.

L. 2020:

(1.5)(a) amended, (SB 20-166), ch. 280, p. 1372, § 4, effective July 13.

42-2-506. Identification documents - individuals temporarily lawfully present.

An individual who is temporarily present in the United States may apply for an identification document under this section. The department shall issue an identification document if:

The individual:

Qualifies for the document applied for except for qualifications that conflict with this section; and

Produces documents that satisfy the department that the individual is lawfully present in the United States; and

The federal government confirms the individual's status, including electronically through the SAVE system.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire part added, (SB 13-251), ch. 402, p. 2354, § 4, effective August 7.

L. 2014:

(1)(b) amended, (HB 14-1363), ch. 302, p. 1276, § 46, effective May 31.

Cross references:

For the automated system know as Systematic Alien Verification for Entitlements (SAVE), referred to in subsection (1)(b), see 49 U.S.C. § 30301 note.

42-2-507. Taxpayer identification number - confidentiality.

The department shall keep the applicant's individual taxpayer identification number confidential and shall not place it on the applicant's document; except that this confidentiality requirement does not extend to the state child support enforcement agency, the department, or a court of competent jurisdiction when requesting information in the course of activities authorized under article 13 of title 26, C.R.S., or article 14 of title 14, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire part added, (SB 13-251), ch. 402, p. 2354, § 4, effective August 7.

42-2-508. Fees - operations - rule.

The department may promulgate a rule imposing an additional fee for issuance of a document issued under this part 5 to cover the direct and indirect cost of implementing this part 5. The department shall set the fee in accordance with section 42-2-114.5 (2). The department shall transfer the fees to the state treasurer, who shall credit the fees to the licensing services cash fund, created in section 42-2-114.5 (1).

Repealed.

By July 1, 2020, the department shall issue identification documents under this part 5 in an efficient manner at ten or more offices, including offices operating before July 1, 2020, that are geographically distributed throughout the state.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire part added, (SB 13-251), ch. 402, p. 2354, § 4, effective August 7.

L. 2014:

Entire section amended, (SB 14-194), ch. 346, p. 1551, § 17, effective June 5.

L. 2019:

Entire section amended, (SB 19-139), ch. 298, p. 2757, § 1, effective May 28.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2)(a) provided for the repeal of subsection (2)(a), effective July 1, 2020. (See

L. 2019, p. 2757

.)

42-2-509. Renewal - duplicate - replacement - rules.

Renewal.

An identification document issued under this part 5 expires three years after issuance. The holder of the document must apply for renewal in accordance with section 42-2-118 or 42-2-304, as applicable, to continue to hold a valid identification document; except that the holder:

Need not demonstrate lawful presence if the identification document was issued under section 42-2-504;

Is not permitted to extend the expiration date under section 42-2-118 (1)(b)(I); and

Is not permitted to obtain an identification document using a sworn statement of the person's social security number.

To renew an identification document issued under section 42-2-504 to a person who is not lawfully present, the holder must present the identification document and provide evidence of current Colorado residency as determined by the department by rule.

Duplicate permits, minor licenses, and identification cards - replacements. If an instruction permit, minor driver's license, or identification card issued under this part 5 is lost, stolen, or destroyed, the person to whom it was issued may obtain a duplicate or replacement in accordance with section 42-2-117 or 42-2-305, as applicable.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire part added, (SB 13-251), ch. 402, p. 2354, § 4, effective August 7.

L. 2018:

Entire section amended, (SB 18-108), ch. 260, p. 1596, § 3, effective January 1, 2019.

42-2-510. Peace officers - arrest authority.

An immigration status violation is a federal offense. A peace officer is not authorized to arrest an individual merely for possessing an identification document issued under this part 5.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire part added, (SB 13-251), ch. 402, p. 2354, § 4, effective August 7.

42-2-511. Driving test - third-party option - definition.

As used in this section, "driving test" means the demonstration of ordinary and reasonable care in the operation of a motor vehicle in accordance with section 42-2-111.

To use the procedure set forth in subsection (3) of this section, an applicant for an identification document must fulfill the applicable requirements of this part 5 and part 1 of this article other than the driving test.

If an applicant for an identification document under this part 5 fails the driving test, the applicant may retake the driving test from a vendor approved by the department to conduct the test. If the applicant passes the driving test within sixty days after failing the driving test, the applicant may reopen the application for a driver's license at any office authorized to issue identification documents to the applicant. To be issued the license under this part 5, the applicant must present evidence of passing the test.

Source: L. 2016:

Entire section added, (HB 16-1415), ch. 139, p. 414, § 5, effective May 4.